Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.450

Job order procedure—Work orders.

(1) The maximum dollar amount for a work order is five hundred thousand dollars, excluding Washington state sales and use tax.

(2) All work orders issued for the same project shall be treated as a single work order for purposes of the dollar limit on work orders.

(3) No more than twenty percent of the dollar value of a work order may consist of items of work not contained in the unit price book.

(4) Any new stand-alone permanent structure constructed under a work order shall not exceed three thousand gross square feet.

(5) A public body may issue no work orders under a job order contract until it has approved, in consultation with the office of minority and women's business enterprises or the equivalent local agency, a plan prepared by the job order contractor that equitably spreads certified women and minority business enterprise subcontracting opportunities, to the extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400, among the various subcontract disciplines.

(6) For purposes of chapters 39.08, 39.12, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW, each work order issued shall be treated as a separate contract. The alternate filing provisions of RCW 39.12.040(2) apply to each work order that otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of RCW 39.12.040(2).

(7) The job order contract shall not be used for the procurement of architectural or engineering services not associated with specific work orders. Architectural and engineering services shall be procured in accordance with RCW 39.80.040.

(8) Any work order over three hundred fifty thousand dollars, excluding Washington state sales and use tax, and including over six hundred single trade hours shall utilize a state registered apprenticeship program for that single trade in accordance with RCW 39.04.320. Awarding entities may adjust this requirement for a specific work order for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas;

(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation;

(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310; or

(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate.

[ 2019 c 212 s 10; 2012 c 102 s 2; 2007 c 494 s 404.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.